Illinois, session 104th, SB3418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Mental Health Act is amended by 5changing Section 3d as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 20/3d)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 303d)7    Sec. 3d. The expenses incurred by any community mental 8health board in the performance of duties imposed upon it or 9its members shall be a charge on the board and shall be paid 10out of the "Community Mental Health Fund" hereinafter 11established.12    The governing body may from time to time fix, by 13ordinance, compensation for members of the community mental 14health board. Such compensation may be computed on a per diem 15basis, on an annual basis, or on a combined per diem and annual 16basis.17    Until compensation is fixed by the governing body as 18provided in this Section, members of the community mental 19health board shall serve without compensation. Once fixed, no 20change in the compensation of any member, or the basis 21therefore, shall take effect during the term of office for 22which such member has been appointed.23    Any compensation provided for by the governing body under   SB3418- 2 -LRB104 17637 KTG 31068 b1this Section shall be a charge on the board and shall be paid 2out of the "Community Mental Health Fund".3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, no 4person who is the spouse of or an immediate family member 5living with any member of the governing body may receive any 6compensation whatsoever for his or her service on a community 7mental health board. No member shall receive payment, except 8expenses, for service on the board.9(Source: P.A. 78-574.)